Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.260

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Complaint—Director's powers and duties.

In case of failure by a licensee to pay amounts due a vendor or consignor creditor whose livestock was handled or sold through or at the licensee's public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale, as evidenced by a verified complaint filed with the director, the director may proceed immediately to ascertain the names and addresses of all vendor or consignor creditors of the licensee, together with the amounts due and owing to them and each of them by the licensee, and shall request all vendor and consignor creditors to file a verified statement of their respective claims with the director. This request shall be addressed to each known vendor or consignor creditor at his or her last known address.

[ 2003 c 326 s 78; 1983 c 298 s 14; 1959 c 107 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.